Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1241
Bridges; damage to property; payment; how ascertained.

The governing body of the city shall cause to be assessed the damages to property by reason of the construction and operation of the complete bridge property and appurtenances and to pay same out of funds provided for in sections 14-1201 to 14-1252. The damages sustained shall be ascertained and determined as provided in sections 76-704 to 76-724. Similar powers may be exercised in an adjoining state if and in the manner authorized by an act of Congress or the law of that state.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 19, p. 627;

C.S.1929, § 14-1219;

R.S.1943, § 14-1241;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 43, p. 466.